District of Columbia statutes.
47-2850

Rules governing the business of furnishing towing services for motor vehicles.

(a)

The Mayor is authorized, in accordance with [subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2], to:

(1)

Promulgate rules to govern the business of furnishing towing services for motor vehicles; and

(2)

Amend or repeal any provision of chapter 4 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations governing the business of furnishing towing services for motor vehicles.

(b)

Rules proposed pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed regulations, in whole or in part, by resolution, within this 45-day review period, the proposed regulations shall be deemed disapproved.

(c)

(1)

Any person who violates any of the rules promulgated pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] per violation, imprisonment for not more that [than] 90 days, or both.

(2)

All prosecutions for violations of any rule or regulation issued pursuant to this section shall be in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in the name of the District of Columbia by information signed by the Attorney General or one of his or her assistants.

(3)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the rules issued pursuant to this section, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infractions shall be pursuant Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-279, § 2, 52 DCR 841
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(t), 60 DCR 2064

Cross References

Alcoholic beverage control, licensing, see § 25-101 et seq.
Child foster care placement, licensing and endorsements, see § 4-1402.
Cooperative associations, licensing and endorsements, see § 29-944.
Educational institutions, licensing and endorsements, see § 29-615.
Financial institutions, money lenders, licensing and endorsements, see § 26-901.
Mortgage lenders and brokers, licensing and endorsements, see § 26-1103.
Taxicabs, licensing and endorsements, see § 50-319.
Weapons sales, licensing and endorsements, see § 22-4510.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not exceeding $1,000” in (c)(1).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Towing Vehicles Rulemaking Authority Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-126, May 2, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 4401).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Towing Vehicles Rulemaking Authority Continuation Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-277, April 2, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2740).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Towing Regulation and Enforcement Authority Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-93, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3613).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Towing Regulation and Enforcement Authority Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-248, March 17, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4124).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of § 47-2850, see § 2(b) of Towing Vehicles Rulemaking Authority Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-266, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1465).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 47-2850, see § 2(b) of Towing Vehicles Rulemaking Authority Continuation Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-567, December 23, 2002, 50 DCR 294).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Towing Regulation and Enforcement Authority Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-225, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10706).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Towing Regulation and Enforcement Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-373, February 19, 2004, 51 DCR 2615).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Towing Regulation and Enforcement Authority Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-554, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10364).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Towing Regulation and Enforcement Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-17, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2960).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(t) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Resolutions

Resolution 15-62, the “Towing Services for Motor Vehicles Rulemaking Approval Resolution of 2003”, was approved effective March

Resolution 15-437, the ‘Towing Regulation and Enforcement Authority Approval Resolution of 2004‘, was approved effective February 3, 2004.

Resolution 15-813, the “Towing Regulation and Enforcement Authority Regulation Approval Resolution of 2004”, was approved effective December 21, 2004.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.